Maryland, session 2025, HB1321.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–758.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION, “SMALL BUSINESS” MEANS A BUSINESS
CONDUCTED BY AN INDIVIDUAL, A PARTNERSHIP, A LIMITED PARTNERSHIP, A
LIMITED LIABILITY PARTNERSHIP, A LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY, OR A
CORPORATION THAT EMPLOYS 50 OR FEWER EMPLOYEES.
(2) “SMALL BUSINESS” INCLUDES A BUSINESS THAT DOES NOT
EMPLOY ANY EMPLOYEES.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1321*

HOUSE BILL 1321
(B) A SMALL BUSINESS MAY CLAIM A CREDIT AGAINST THE STATE INCOME
TAX IN AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE ACTUAL COSTS INCURRED BY THE SMALL
BUSINESS DURING THE TAXABLE YEAR:
(1) TO CONDUCT AN INITIAL CYBERSECURITY RISK ASSESSMENT AND
IMPLEMENT RECOMMENDATIONS RESULTING FROM THE ASSESSMENT, NOT TO
EXCEED $1,000; OR
(2) FOR RECURRING CYBERSECURITY MEASURES UNDERTAKEN BY
THE SMALL BUSINESS, INCLUDING CYBERSECURITY RISK ASSESSMENTS OTHER
THAN AN INITIAL ASSESSMENT UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
ANTIVIRUS SOFTWARE, MULTIFACTOR AUTHENTICATION, AND DATA ENCRYPTION,
NOT TO EXCEED $500.
(C) IF THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION IN ANY TAXABLE YEAR
EXCEEDS THE STATE INCOME TAX FOR THAT TAXABLE YEAR, THE SMALL BUSINESS
MAY CLAIM A REFUND IN THE AMOUNT OF THE EXCESS.
(D) TO CLAIM THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION, THE SMALL
BUSINESS SHALL ATTACH TO THE SMALL BUSINESS’S INCOME TAX RETURN OR
OTHERWISE FILE WITH THE COMPTROLLER PROOF OF THE COSTS INCURRED BY THE
SMALL BUSINESS FOR WHICH THE SMALL BUSINESS MAY CLAIM THE CREDIT UNDER
THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024.